Utah statutes.
13-2-8.   Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund."

(2) (a)  Unless otherwise provided by a chapter listed in Section 13-2-1, all money not distributed as consumer restitution that is received by the division from administrative fines and settlements, from criminal restitution, or from civil damages, forfeitures, penalties, and settlements when the division receives the money on its own behalf and not in a representative capacity, shall be deposited into the fund.

(b)  Any portion of the fund may be maintained in an interest-bearing account.

(c)  All interest earned on fund money shall be deposited into the fund.

(3)  Notwithstanding Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the division may use the fund with the approval of the executive director of the Department of Commerce in a manner consistent with the duties of the division under this chapter for:

(a)  consumer protection education for members of the public;

(b)  equipment for and training of division personnel;

(c)  publication of consumer protection brochures, laws, policy statements, or other material relevant to the division's enforcement efforts; and

(d)  investigation and litigation undertaken by the division.

(4)  If the balance in the fund exceeds $100,000 at the close of any fiscal year, the excess shall be transferred to the General Fund.

